Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Assistance Program Frauds

194A.500.
Definitions for KRS 194A.505.

As used in KRS 194A.505:

“Assistance program” means any program administered by the cabinet;

“Benefit” means receipt of money, goods, or anything of pecuniary value from an assistance program;

“False statement or misrepresentation” means a statement or representation knowingly made by a person to be false; and

“Provider” means an individual, corporation, association, facility, or institution that is providing or has been approved to provide medical assistance to recipients under the Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 23, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.505.
Prohibited activities — Commencement of proceedings for enforcement.

No person shall, with intent to defraud, knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation or by other means fail to disclose a material fact used in determining the person’s qualification to receive benefits under any assistance program.

No person shall, with intent to defraud, fail to report a change in the factors affecting the person’s eligibility for benefits.

No person shall, with intent to defraud, knowingly use, attempt to use, acquire, transfer, forge, alter, traffic, counterfeit, or possess a medical identification card, food stamp or food stamp identification card, or unique electronic authorization codes or numbers or electronic personal identification numbers in any manner not authorized by law.

No person having responsibility for the administration of an assistance program shall, having knowledge that it is in violation of the law, knowingly aid or abet any person in obtaining benefits to which the person is not legally entitled, or in obtaining a benefit amount greater than that to which the person is fully entitled.

No person shall misappropriate or attempt to misappropriate a food stamp authorization-to-purchase card, food stamp identification card, or Medicaid identification card or misappropriate other benefits from any program with which the person has been assigned responsibility, nor shall the person knowingly fail to report any of these activities when it is clearly in violation of the law.

No person shall, with intent to defraud or deceive, devise a scheme or plan a scheme or artifice to obtain benefits from any assistance program by means of false or fraudulent representations or intentionally engage in conduct that advances the scheme or artifice.

No person shall aid and abet another individual in acts prohibited in subsections (1) to (6) of this section knowing it to be in violation of the law.

The Attorney General on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky may commence proceedings to enforce this section, and the Attorney General shall in undertaking these proceedings exercise all powers and perform all duties that a prosecuting attorney would otherwise perform or exercise.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 24, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 30, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.510.
Defense in prosecution.

In any prosecution for the violation of KRS 194A.505, it shall be a defense if the person relied on the advice of an employee or agent of the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 25, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.515.
Access to criminal records by cabinet’s agents.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS 194A.505 and KRS 205.8451 to 205.8483 and of investigating any assistance program administered by the cabinet, the designated agents of the cabinet shall have the same access as peace officers to records maintained under KRS 17.150.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 26, effective July 15, 1998.